Nevada, session 83, SB233.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 2. 1. The Council on Food Security created by NRS
232.4966 shall conduct a study during the 2025-2026 interim on the
Home Feeds Nevada Agriculture Food Purchase Program
established pursuant to NRS 561.515 concerning issues relating to
the long-term financial stability of the Program, which must include,
without limitation, identifying sustainable sources of revenue to
fund the Program.
2. On or before December 1, 2026, the Council shall prepare
and submit a written report describing the results of the study to:
(a) The Director of the State Department of Agriculture; and
(b) The Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for
transmittal to the 84th Session of the Legislature.
-
83rd Session (2025)

3. The Council may request the drafting of not more than one
legislative measure which relates to matters within the scope of the
Home Feeds Nevada Agriculture Food Purchase Program. The
request must be submitted to the Legislative Counsel on or before
December 1, 2026, and must be on a form prescribed by the
Legislative Counsel. A legislative measure requested pursuant to
this subsection must be prefiled on or before the first day of the
regular session of the 84th Session of the Legislature. A legislative
measure that is not prefiled on or before that day shall be deemed
withdrawn.
Sec. 3. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Nutritious Food Purchase Account created by
NRS 561.505 the sum of $800,000 for use by the Director of the
State Department of Agriculture to carry out the Home Feeds
Nevada Agriculture Food Purchase Program established pursuant to
NRS 561.515.
2. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 4. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)